Utah statutes.
70A-3-306.   Claims to an instrument.

A person taking an instrument, other than a person having rights of a holder in due course, is subject to a claim of a property or possessory right in the instrument or its proceeds, including a claim to rescind a negotiation and to recover the instrument or its proceeds.  A person having rights of a holder in due course takes free of the claim to the instrument.

